Wisconsin, session 2025, AB340.
do enact as follows:AB340,11Section 1. 49.45 (39) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB340,3,18249.45 (39) (b) 1. ‘Payment for school medical services.’ If a school district or a 3cooperative educational service agency elects to provide school medical services and 4meets all requirements under par. (c), the department shall reimburse the school 5district or the cooperative educational service agency for 60 100 percent of the 6federal share of allowable charges for the school medical services that it provides 7and, as specified in subd. 2., for allowable administrative costs. If the Wisconsin 8Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired or the Wisconsin Educational Services 9Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing elects to provide school medical services 10and meets all requirements under par. (c), the department shall reimburse the 11department of public instruction for 60 100 percent of the federal share of allowable 12charges for the school medical services that the Wisconsin Center for the Blind and 13Visually Impaired or the Wisconsin Educational Services Program for the Deaf and 14Hard of Hearing provides and, as specified in subd. 2., for allowable administrative 15costs. A school district, cooperative educational service agency, the Wisconsin 16Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired, or the Wisconsin Educational Services 1Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing may submit, and the department shall 2allow, claims for common carrier transportation costs as a school medical service 3unless the department receives notice from the federal health care financing 4administration that, under a change in federal policy, the claims are not allowed. If 5the department receives the notice, a school district, cooperative educational service 6agency, the Wisconsin Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired, or the Wisconsin 7Educational Services Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing may submit, and 8the department shall allow, unreimbursed claims for common carrier 9transportation costs incurred before the date of the change in federal policy. The 10department shall promulgate rules establishing a methodology for making 11reimbursements under this paragraph. All other expenses for the school medical 12services provided by a school district or a cooperative educational service agency 13shall be paid for by the school district or the cooperative educational service agency 14with funds received from state or local taxes. The school district, the Wisconsin 15Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired, the Wisconsin Educational Services 16Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, or the cooperative educational service 17agency shall comply with all requirements of the federal department of health and 18human services for receiving federal financial participation.AB340,219Section 2. 49.45 (39) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB340,4,62049.45 (39) (b) 2. ‘Payment for school medical services administrative costs.’ 21The department shall reimburse a school district or a cooperative educational 22service agency specified under subd. 1. and shall reimburse the department of 23public instruction on behalf of the Wisconsin Center for the Blind and Visually 1Impaired or the Wisconsin Educational Services Program for the Deaf and Hard of 2Hearing for 90 100 percent of the federal share of allowable administrative costs, 3using time studies, beginning in fiscal year 1999-2000. A school district or a 4cooperative educational service agency may submit, and the department of health 5services shall allow, claims for administrative costs incurred during the period that 6is up to 24 months before the date of the claim, if allowable under federal law.AB340,4,77